Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1836
Investigations; powers.

The commission is hereby authorized to designate or appoint, from among its employees, examiners and referees to make investigations that are required of the commission by law. Such investigations shall be made and conducted as and in the manner and at the place directed by the commission. The examiners and referees shall report their findings and recommendations to the commission.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 36.